Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7925.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 21-28 of the General Laws entitled "Uniform Controlled Substances
Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
21-28-2.11. Exemption of psilocybin.
(a) Nothing in this chapter shall apply to any compound, mixture, or preparation containing
less than one ounce (1 oz.) of psilocybin provided the following conditions have been met:
(1) Psilocybin is in possession of one person or shared by one person to another; or
(2) Psilocybin has been securely cultivated within a person’s residence for personal use.
(b) Contingent upon the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) rescheduling of psilocybin,
the Rhode Island department of health shall establish rules and regulations pertaining to cultivation,
distribution and medical prescription.
(c) Contingent upon the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) expansion of its access
program, patients with a serious or life-threatening mental or behavioral health disorder, who are
without access to effective mental or behavioral health medication, shall have access to psilocybin
at locations in Rhode Island approved by the Rhode Island department of health.
(d) The provisions of this section shall sunset on July 1, 2028, and prior to this sunset, the
attorney general shall provide a report to the speaker of the house and president of the senate
relating to the number of violations issued for possession, cultivation, or distribution of psilocybin,
and the director of the department of health shall provide a report to the speaker of the house and
president of the senate relating to the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) scheduling of

psilocybin and permitted use for the treatment of mental or behavioral health disorders.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, and shall sunset on July 1, 2028.
========
LC005740
========
LC005740 - Page 2 of 3